Oklahoma, session 2026, SB905.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. Pursuant to Section 3 of Article V of the Oklahoma


Constitution, there is hereby ordered the following legislative


referendum which shall be filed with the Secretary of State and


addressed to the Governor of the state, who shall submit the same to


the people for their approval or rejection at the next General


Election.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-441 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any person who unlawfully possesses a controlled dangerous


substance while also in possession of a firearm shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not more than


five (5) years.

Req. No. 1234 Page 1


SECTION 3. The Ballot Title for the proposed act shall be in


the following form:


BALLOT TITLE


Legislative Referendum No. ____ State Question No. ____


THE GIST OF THE PROPOSITION IS AS FOLLOWS:


This measure adds a new section of law related to controlled


dangerous substances. The measure creates a felony offense for


being in possession of a firearm while also in possession of a


controlled dangerous substance.


SHALL THE PROPOSAL BE APPROVED?


FOR THE PROPOSAL — YES _____________


AGAINST THE PROPOSAL — NO _____________


SECTION 4. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall,


immediately after the passage of this act, shall prepare and file


one copy thereof, including the Ballot Title set forth in SECTION 3


hereof, with the Secretary of State and one copy with the Attorney


General.




60-1-1234 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:41 AM











Req. No. 1234 Page 2